District of Columbia statutes.
46-305.02

Repealed

Employer’s compliance with income-withholding order of another state.

Repealed.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 502
as added July 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-131, § 2(i), 45 DCR 2924
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(e)(2), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222

Application of Law 12-131: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 46-301.01.

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 502 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”
For temporary addition of section, see § 2(i) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-225, December 23, 1997, 45 DCR 151), and § 2(i) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-310, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1950).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(i) of Uniform Interstate Family Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-94, April 29, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2785).
D.C. Law 16-137, in par. (c)(2), deleted “or agency” following “person”.
1981 Ed., § 30-345.2.